California, session 20252026, SB1431.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3104 of the Elections Code is repealed.3104.Applications for the ballots of military or overseas voters shall be received and, except as provided in Section 3106, the ballots shall be received and canvassed, at the same time and under the same procedure as vote by mail ballots, insofar as that procedure is not inconsistent with this chapter.SEC. 2. Section 3105 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3105. (a) Any application made pursuant to this chapter that is received by the elections official prior to before the 60th day before the election shall be kept and processed on or after the 60th day before the election.(b) (1) The elections official shall send the ballot not earlier than 60 days but not later than 45 days before the election and shall include with the ballot a list of all candidates who have qualified for the ballot and a list of all measures that are to be submitted to the voters and on which the voter is qualified to vote. The voter shall be entitled to write in the name of any specific candidate seeking nomination or election to any office listed on the ballot.(2) The military or overseas voter may, in the alternative to the ballot provided pursuant to paragraph (1), use a federal write-in absentee ballot to vote in any election in which the military or overseas voter is qualified to vote.(c) Notwithstanding Section 15341 or any other provision of law, any name written upon a ballot for a particular office pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be counted for the office or nomination, providing the candidate whose name has been written on the ballot has, as of the date of the election, qualified to have his or her their name placed on the ballot for the office, or has qualified as a write-in candidate for the office.(d) Except as provided in Section 3106, the elections official shall receive and canvass military or overseas voter ballots described in this section under the same procedure as vote by mail ballots, insofar as that procedure is not inconsistent with this section.(e) In the event that If a military or overseas voter executes a ballot pursuant to this section and an application for a vote by mail ballot pursuant to Section 3102, section, the elections official shall process the application and the ballot in accordance with this chapter.(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a military or overseas voter who qualifies pursuant to this chapter may, by facsimile transmission, register to vote and apply for a ballot pursuant to this section or a vote by mail ballot. Upon request, section. After they are registered, the elections official shall send the ballot to the qualified military or overseas voter either by mail, facsimile, or electronic transmission, as requested by the voter.SEC. 3. Section 3112 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3112. Whenever by any statute of the United States, provision is made (a) If any federal statute provides for vote by mail, an application for a vote by mail ballot made under that law may be given the same effect as an application for a vote by mail ballot registration made under this code.If, by any federal statute, provision is made(b) If any federal statute provides for the transmission of applications for vote by mail status to the Secretary of State, he or she they shall transmit the applications to the county elections official of the county in which the applicant claims residence, or for a military or overseas voter qualified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 321, to the county in which the applicant’s parent or legal guardian resided when the parent or legal guardian last lived within the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.SEC. 4. Section 3114 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3114. (a) For an election for which this state has not received a waiver pursuant to the federal Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20301 et seq.), not sooner than 60 days but not later than 45 days before the election, the elections official shall transmit a ballot and balloting materials to each military or overseas voter who, by that date, submits a valid ballot an application to register to vote pursuant to Section 3102.(b) If a valid ballot application from a military or overseas voter arrives after the 45th day before the election, the elections official charged with distributing a ballot and balloting materials to that voter shall transmit them to the voter as soon as practicable after the application arrives.SEC. 5. Section 3120 of the Elections Code is amended to read:3120. The elections official shall request an electronic mail address from each military or overseas voter who registers to vote. A military or overseas voter who provides an electronic mail address may request that his or her their application for a ballot to register to vote be considered a standing request for electronic delivery of a ballot for all elections conducted in the jurisdiction in which he or she is they are eligible to vote. An elections official shall provide for electronic delivery of a ballot to a military or overseas voter who makes a standing request for all elections conducted in the jurisdiction in which he or she is they are eligible to vote.SEC. 6. Section 8062 of the Elections Code is amended to read:8062. (a) The number of registered voters required to sign a nomination paper for the respective offices are as follows:(1) State office or United States Senate, not fewer than 65 nor more than 100. at least 65.(2) House of Representatives in Congress, State Senate or Assembly, State Board of Equalization, or any office voted for in more than one county, and not statewide, not fewer than 40 nor more than 60. at least 40.(3) Candidacy in a single county or any political subdivision of a county, other than State Senate or Assembly, not fewer than 20 nor more than 40. at least 20.(4) With respect to a candidate for a political party committee, if any political party has fewer than 50 voters in the state or in the county or district in which the election is to be held, one-tenth the number of voters of the party.(5) If there are fewer than 150 voters in the county or district in which the election is to be held, not fewer than 10 nor more than 20. at least 10.(b) A candidate may continuously submit signatures, and the county elections official shall continue to verify the signatures, until the requisite number of signatures has been verified. (b)(c) (1) The provisions of this section are mandatory, not directory, and no a nomination paper shall that does not comply with this section shall not be deemed sufficient that does not comply with this section. However, this subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit withdrawal of signatures pursuant to Section 8067. sufficient. This(2) This subdivision also shall not be construed to prohibit a court from validating a signature which that was previously rejected upon showing of proof that the voter whose signature is in question is otherwise qualified to sign the nomination paper.SEC. 7. Section 8067 of the Elections Code is repealed.8067.No more signers shall be secured for any candidate than the maximum number required in this article. If, however, through miscalculation or otherwise, more signers are secured than the maximum number, the officer with whom the nomination papers are filed shall, with the written consent of the candidate, withdraw the excess number.SEC. 8. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.